portugues.affix
flag *K:                # "CAT=v,T=inf"   # Todos Irregulares (frequente [au]ir)
# Excepto guir
U I R       >   -IR,O       # "P=1,N=s,T=p"
A I R       >   -R,O        # "P=1,N=s,T=p"
[UA] I R    >   -R,S        # "P=2,N=s,T=p"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,I       # "P=3,N=s,T=p"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍMOS    # "P=1,N=p,T=p"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍS      # "P=2,N=p,T=p"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,EM      # "P=3,N=p,T=p"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍA      # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pi"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍAS     # "P=2,N=s,T=pi"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍAMOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=pi"  # REG.
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍEIS    # "P=2,N=p,T=pi"  # REG.
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍAM     # "P=3,N=p,T=pi"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,Í       # "P=1,N=s,T=pp"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍSTE    # "P=2,N=s,T=pp"
[UA] I R    >   -R,U        # "P=3,N=s,T=pp"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍMOS    # "P=1,N=p,T=pp"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍSTES   # "P=2,N=p,T=pp"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍRAM    # "P=3,N=p,T=pp"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍRA     # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍRAS    # "P=2,N=s,T=pmp"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍRAMOS  # "P=1,N=p,T=pmp"  # REG.
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍREIS   # "P=2,N=p,T=pmp"  # REG.
[UA] I R    >   EI          # "P=1,N=s,T=f"    # REG.
[UA] I R    >   ÁS          # "P=2,N=s,T=f"    # REG.
[UA] I R    >   Á           # "P=3,N=s,T=f"    # REG.
[UA] I R    >   EMOS        # "P=1,N=p,T=f"    # REG.
[UA] I R    >   EIS         # "P=2,N=p,T=f"    # REG.
[UA] I R    >   ÃO          # "P=3,N=p,T=f"    # REG.
U I R    >   -IR,A        # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pc"
U I R    >   -IR,AS       # "P=2,N=s,T=pc"
U I R    >   -IR,AMOS     # "P=1,N=p,T=pc"
U I R    >   -IR,AIS      # "P=2,N=p,T=pc"
U I R    >   -IR,AM       # "P=3,N=p,T=pc"
A I R    >   -R,A        # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pc"
A I R    >   -R,AS       # "P=2,N=s,T=pc"
A I R    >   -R,AMOS     # "P=1,N=p,T=pc"
A I R    >   -R,AIS      # "P=2,N=p,T=pc"
A I R    >   -R,AM       # "P=3,N=p,T=pc"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍSSE    # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pic"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍSSES   # "P=2,N=s,T=pic"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍSSEMOS # "P=1,N=p,T=pic"  # REG.
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍSSEIS  # "P=2,N=p,T=pic"  # REG.
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍSSEM   # "P=3,N=p,T=pic"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍRES    # "P=2,N=s,T=fc"
[UA] I R    >    MOS        # "P=1,N=p,T=fc"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍRDES   # "P=2,N=p,T=fc"
[UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍREM    # "P=3,N=p,T=fc"
[UA] I R    >   IA          # "P=1_3,N=s,T=c"    # REG
[UA] I R    >   IAS         # "P=2,N=s,T=c"    # REG.
[UA] I R    >   ÍAMOS       # "P=1,N=p,T=c"    # REG.
[UA] I R    >   ÍEIS        # "P=2,N=p,T=c"    # REG.
[UA] I R    >   IAM         # "P=3,N=p,T=c"    # REG.
[UA] I R    >   -IR,Í       # "P=2,N=p,T=i"  
[UA] I R    >   -R,NDO      # "T=g"        # REG.
[^Q][UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍDO     # "G=m,N=s,T=ppa"
[^Q][UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍDA     # "G=f,N=s,T=ppa"
[^Q][UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍDOS    # "G=m,N=p,T=ppa"
[^Q][UA] I R    >   -IR,ÍDAS    # "G=f,N=p,T=ppa"
Q U I R    >   -IR,IDO     # "G=m,N=s,T=ppa"
Q U I R    >   -IR,IDA     # "G=f,N=s,T=ppa"
Q U I R    >   -IR,IDOS    # "G=m,N=p,T=ppa"
Q U I R    >   -IR,IDAS    # "G=f,N=p,T=ppa"
P O R       >   -R,NHO        # "P=1,N=s,T=p"
P O R       >   -OR,ÕES       # "P=2,N=s,T=p"
P O R       >   -OR,ÕE        # "P=3,N=s,T=p"
P O R       >   -R,MOS        # "P=1,N=p,T=p"
P O R       >   -R,NDES       # "P=2,N=p,T=p"
P O R       >   -OR,ÕEM       # "P=3,N=p,T=p"
P O R       >   -OR,UNHA      # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pi"
P O R       >   -OR,UNHAS     # "P=2,N=s,T=pi"
P O R       >   -OR,ÚNHAMOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=pi"
P O R       >   -OR,ÚNHEIS    # "P=2,N=p,T=pi"
P O R       >   -OR,UNHAM     # "P=3,N=p,T=pi"
P O R       >   -OR,US        # "P=1,N=s,T=pp"
P O R       >   -OR,USESTE    # "P=2,N=s,T=pp"
P O R       >   -OR,ÔS        # "P=3,N=s,T=pp"
P O R       >   -OR,USEMOS    # "P=1,N=p,T=pp"
P O R       >   -OR,USESTES   # "P=2,N=p,T=pp"
P O R       >   -OR,USERAM    # "P=3,N=p,T=pp"
P O R       >   -OR,USERA     # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp"
P O R       >   -OR,USERAS    # "P=2,N=s,T=pmp"
P O R       >   -OR,USÉRAMOS  # "P=1,N=p,T=pmp"
P O R       >   -OR,USÉREIS   # "P=2,N=p,T=pmp"
P O R       >   EI            # "P=1,N=s,T=f"
P O R       >   ÁS            # "P=2,N=s,T=f"
P O R       >   Á             # "P=3,N=s,T=f"
P O R       >   EMOS          # "P=1,N=p,T=f"
P O R       >   EIS           # "P=2,N=p,T=f"
P O R       >   ÃO            # "P=3,N=p,T=f"
P O R       >   -R,NHA        # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pc"
P O R       >   -R,NHAS       # "P=2,N=s,T=pc"
P O R       >   -R,NHAMOS     # "P=1,N=p,T=pc"
P O R       >   -R,NHAIS      # "P=2,N=p,T=pc"
P O R       >   -R,NHAM       # "P=3,N=p,T=pc"
P O R       >   -OR,USESSE    # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pic"
P O R       >   -OR,USESSES   # "P=2,N=s,T=pic"
P O R       >   -OR,USÉSSEMOS # "P=1,N=p,T=pic"
P O R       >   -OR,USÉSSEIS  # "P=2,N=p,T=pic"
P O R       >   -OR,USESSEM   # "P=3,N=p,T=pic"
P O R       >   -OR,USER      # "P=1,N=s,T=fc"
P O R       >   -OR,USERES    # "P=2,N=s,T=fc"
P O R       >   -OR,USER      # "P=3,N=s,T=fc"
P O R       >   -OR,USERMOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=fc"
P O R       >   -OR,USERDES   # "P=2,N=p,T=fc"
P O R       >   -OR,USEREM    # "P=3,N=p,T=fc"
P O R       >   IA            # "P=1_3,N=s,T=c"
P O R       >   IAS           # "P=2,N=s,T=c"
P O R       >   ÍAMOS         # "P=1,N=p,T=c"
P O R       >   ÍEIS          # "P=2,N=p,T=c"
P O R       >   IAM           # "P=3,N=p,T=c"
P O R       >   -R,NDE        # "P=2,N=p,T=i"    
P O R       >   -R,NDO        # "T=g"
P O R       >   -R,STO        # "G=m,N=s,T=ppa"
P O R       >   -R,STA        # "G=f,N=s,T=ppa"
P O R       >   -R,STOS       # "G=m,N=p,T=ppa"
P O R       >   -R,STAS       # "G=f,N=p,T=ppa"
P O R       >   ES            # "P=2,N=s,T=ip"
P O R       >   MOS           # "P=1,N=p,T=ip"
P O R       >   DES           # "P=2,N=p,T=ip"
P O R       >   EM            # "P=3,N=p,T=ip"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,ÇO         # "P=1,N=s,T=p"
F A Z E R   >   -R,S            # "P=2,N=s,T=p"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,Z          # "P=3,N=s,T=p"
F A Z E R   >   -R,MOS          # "P=1,N=p,T=p"
F A Z E R   >   -R,IS           # "P=2,N=p,T=p"
F A Z E R   >   -R,M            # "P=3,N=p,T=p"
F A Z E R   >   -ER,IA          # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pi"
F A Z E R   >   -ER,IAS         # "P=2,N=s,T=pi"
F A Z E R   >   -ER,ÍAMOS       # "P=1,N=p,T=pi"
F A Z E R   >   -ER,ÍEIS        # "P=2,N=p,T=pi"
F A Z E R   >   -ER,IAM         # "P=3,N=p,T=pi"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZ        # "P=1,N=s,T=pp"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZESTE    # "P=2,N=s,T=pp"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,EZ        # "P=3,N=s,T=pp"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZEMOS    # "P=1,N=p,T=pp"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZESTES   # "P=2,N=p,T=pp"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZERAM    # "P=3,N=p,T=pp"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZERA     # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZERAS    # "P=2,N=s,T=pmp"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZÉRAMOS  # "P=1,N=p,T=pmp"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZÉREIS   # "P=2,N=p,T=pmp"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,REI        # "P=1,N=s,T=f"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,RÁS        # "P=2,N=s,T=f"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,RÁ         # "P=3,N=s,T=f"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,REMOS      # "P=1,N=p,T=f"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,REIS       # "P=2,N=p,T=f"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,RÃO        # "P=3,N=p,T=f"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,ÇA         # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pc"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,ÇAS        # "P=2,N=s,T=pc"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,ÇAMOS      # "P=1,N=p,T=pc"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,ÇAIS       # "P=2,N=p,T=pc"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,ÇAM        # "P=3,N=p,T=pc"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZESSE    # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pic"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZESSES   # "P=2,N=s,T=pic"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZÉSSEMOS # "P=1,N=p,T=pic"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZÉSSEIS  # "P=2,N=p,T=pic"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZESSEM   # "P=3,N=p,T=pic"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZER      # "P=1,N=s,T=fc"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZERES    # "P=2,N=s,T=fc"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZER      # "P=3,N=s,T=fc"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZERMOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=fc"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZERDES   # "P=2,N=p,T=fc"
F A Z E R   >   -AZER,IZEREM    # "P=3,N=p,T=fc"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,RIA        # "P=1_3,N=s,T=c"
F A Z E R   >   -ZER,RIAS       # "P=2,N=s,T=c"
